Washington statutes.
RCW 36.115.030

Coordination—Consistency.

A service agreement addressing children and family services shall enhance coordination and shall be consistent with the comprehensive plan developed under chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.

[ 1994 c 266 s 3.]